Arkansas statutes. Title 2 Agriculture
Chapter 35 Marketing, Sale, and Transportation
2-36-307. Arkansas-Oklahoma District Fair.

There is established a district livestock show to be known as the “Arkansas-Oklahoma District Fair” and to be located in Fort Smith, Sebastian County, Arkansas at Kay Rodgers Park.

The Arkansas-Oklahoma District Fair district shall be composed of:

However, the fair may not commence earlier than the third Friday following Labor Day unless all Arkansas county fairs in the district have been completed before the proposed earlier date.

History.

Acts 2003, No. 685, § 1.